Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.145

Provisions applicable to plan 1.

RCW 41.40.150 through 41.40.363 shall apply only to members of plan 1.

[ 1992 c 72 s 9; 1991 c 35 s 105.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.